Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.070

Appointment of agent to receive process.

Each commercial telephone solicitor shall appoint the director of the department of licensing as an agent to receive civil process under this chapter if the commercial telephone solicitor has no properly registered agent, if the agent has resigned, or if the agent cannot, after reasonable diligence, be found.

[ 1989 c 20 s 7.]